Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.360

Unlicensed providers—Notification to agency—Penalty—Posting on website.

When the department suspects that an agency is providing child care services without a license, it shall send notice to that agency within ten days. The notice shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:

(1) That a license is required and the reasons why;

(2) That the agency is suspected of providing child care without a license;

(3) That the agency must immediately stop providing child care until the agency becomes licensed;

(4) That the department can issue a penalty of one hundred fifty dollars per day for each day a family day care home provided care without being licensed and two hundred fifty dollars for each day a child day care center or outdoor nature-based child care provider provided care without being licensed;

(5) That if the agency does not initiate the licensing process within thirty days of the date of the notice, the department will post on its website that the agency is providing child care without a license.

[ 2021 c 304 s 17; 2011 c 296 s 3. Formerly RCW 43.215.335.]

NOTES:

Short title—2011 c 296: See note following RCW 43.216.325.